public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -ír
# themeT1 + ir/AeE
# themeT8 + o/eJL
SFX e Y 232
SFX e 0 me/G ir
SFX e ir é/FP ir
SFX e ir éa/FJLP ir
SFX e ir éami/K ir
SFX e ir éau/Q ir
SFX e ir ée/JL ir
SFX e ir éelo/B ir
SFX e ir éeƚo/B ir
SFX e ir éemi/K ir
SFX e ir éi/NP ir
SFX e ir éimo/L ir
SFX e ir éimoi/M ir
SFX e ir éitu/O ir
SFX e ir éndome/G ir
SFX e ir éndomene/G ir
SFX e ir éo/JL ir
SFX e ir éomi/K ir
SFX e ir ésimo ir
SFX e ir éu/Q ir
SFX e ir évami/K ir
SFX e ir évau/Q ir
SFX e ir évelo/B ir
SFX e ir éveƚo/B ir
SFX e ir évemi/K ir
SFX e ir évimo/L ir
SFX e ir évimoi/M ir
SFX e ir évitu/O ir
SFX e ir évomi/K ir
SFX e ir í/FP ir
SFX e ir ía/FJLP ir
SFX e ir íami/K ir
SFX e ir íau/Q ir
SFX e ir íe/JL ir
SFX e ir íelo/B ir
SFX e ir íeƚo/B ir
SFX e ir íemi/K ir
SFX e ir íi/NP ir
SFX e ir íimo/L ir
SFX e ir íimoi/M ir
SFX e ir íitu/O ir
SFX e ir ímoi/M ir
SFX e ir índome/G ir
SFX e ir índomene/G ir
SFX e ir ío/JL ir
SFX e ir íomi/K ir
SFX e ir írmene/G ir
SFX e ir ísimo ir
SFX e ir ísitu/O ir
SFX e ir íu/Q ir
SFX e ir ívami/K ir
SFX e ir ívau/Q ir
SFX e ir ívelo/B ir
SFX e ir íveƚo/B ir
SFX e ir ívemi/K ir
SFX e ir ívimo/L ir
SFX e ir ívimoi/M ir
SFX e ir ívitu/O ir
SFX e ir ívomi/K ir
SFX e ir arà/FJLN ir
SFX e ir aràe/F ir
SFX e ir aràvelo/B ir
SFX e ir aràveƚo/B ir
SFX e ir aràvemi/K ir
SFX e ir arè/JL ir
SFX e ir arèmi/K ir
SFX e ir aré/P ir
SFX e ir arémoi/M ir
SFX e ir arémome/G ir
SFX e ir arémomene/G ir
SFX e ir arésimo/L ir
SFX e ir arésimoi/M ir
SFX e ir arésitu/O ir
SFX e ir aréu/Q ir
SFX e ir aría/FJLN ir
SFX e ir aríami/K ir
SFX e ir aríatu/O ir
SFX e ir aríe/FJL ir
SFX e ir aríelo/B ir
SFX e ir aríeƚo/B ir
SFX e ir aríemi/K ir
SFX e ir arísitu/O ir
SFX e ir arò/JL ir
SFX e ir aròmi/K ir
SFX e ir aralo/B ir
SFX e ir araƚo/B ir
SFX e ir arami/K ir
SFX e ir aratu/O ir
SFX e ir arave/FS ir
SFX e ir aremo/EL ir
SFX e ir aren/L ir
SFX e ir areni/M ir
SFX e ir arense ir
SFX e ir aresi/P ir
SFX e ir aresiu/Q ir
SFX e ir arié/P ir
SFX e ir ariéu/Q ir
SFX e ir arion/L ir
SFX e ir arioni/M ir
SFX e ir arionse ir
SFX e ir arisen/L ir
SFX e ir ariseni/M ir
SFX e ir arisense ir
SFX e ir arisié/P ir
SFX e ir arisiéu/Q ir
SFX e ir arisi/P ir
SFX e ir arision/L ir
SFX e ir arisioni/M ir
SFX e ir arisionse ir
SFX e ir arisiu/Q ir
SFX e ir arison/L ir
SFX e ir arisoni/M ir
SFX e ir arisonse ir
SFX e ir aron/L ir
SFX e ir aroni/M ir
SFX e ir aronse ir
SFX e ir ede/P ir
SFX e ir ege/P ir
SFX e ir en/L ir
SFX e ir endo/E ir
SFX e ir eni/M ir
SFX e ir ense ir
SFX e ir ente/I ir
SFX e ir erà/FJLN ir
SFX e ir eràe/F ir
SFX e ir eràvelo/B ir
SFX e ir eràveƚo/B ir
SFX e ir eràvemi/K ir
SFX e ir erè/JL ir
SFX e ir erèmi/K ir
SFX e ir eré/P ir
SFX e ir erémoi/M ir
SFX e ir erémome/G ir
SFX e ir erémomene/G ir
SFX e ir erésimo/L ir
SFX e ir erésimoi/M ir
SFX e ir erésitu/Q ir
SFX e ir eréu/Q ir
SFX e ir ería/FJLN ir
SFX e ir eríami/K ir
SFX e ir eríatu/O ir
SFX e ir eríe/FJL ir
SFX e ir eríelo/B ir
SFX e ir eríeƚo/B ir
SFX e ir eríemi/K ir
SFX e ir erísitu/Q ir
SFX e ir erò/JL ir
SFX e ir eròmi/K ir
SFX e ir eralo/B ir
SFX e ir eraƚo/B ir
SFX e ir erami/K ir
SFX e ir eratu/O ir
SFX e ir erave/FS ir
SFX e ir eremo/EL ir
SFX e ir eren/L ir
SFX e ir ereni/M ir
SFX e ir erense ir
SFX e ir eresi/P ir
SFX e ir eresiu/Q ir
SFX e ir erié/P ir
SFX e ir eriéu/Q ir
SFX e ir erion/L ir
SFX e ir erioni/M ir
SFX e ir erionse ir
SFX e ir erisen/L ir
SFX e ir eriseni/M ir
SFX e ir erisense ir
SFX e ir erisié/P ir
SFX e ir erisiéu/Q ir
SFX e ir erisi/P ir
SFX e ir erision/L ir
SFX e ir erisioni/M ir
SFX e ir erisionse ir
SFX e ir erisiu/Q ir
SFX e ir erison/L ir
SFX e ir erisoni/M ir
SFX e ir erisonse ir
SFX e ir eron/L ir
SFX e ir eroni/M ir
SFX e ir eronse ir
SFX e ir ese/IT ir
SFX e ir esto/BI ir
SFX e ir eva/FJLP ir
SFX e ir eve/JL ir
SFX e ir evi/NP ir
SFX e ir evo/JL ir
SFX e ir on/EL ir
SFX e ir oni/M ir
SFX e ir onme/G ir
SFX e o a/E o
SFX e o e/EFIJL o
SFX e o elo/B o
SFX e o eƚo/B o
SFX e o emi/K o
SFX e o i/EFN o
SFX e o ime/H o
SFX e o itu/O o
SFX e o omi/K o
SFX e r é/P ir
SFX e r éu/Q ir
SFX e r do/B ir
SFX e r ede/P ir
SFX e r ege/P ir
SFX e r ge ir
SFX e r me/H ir
SFX e r mo/EL ir
SFX e r on/EL [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e r oni/M [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e r onme/G [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e r se/IT ir
SFX e r sen/L ir
SFX e r seni/M ir
SFX e r sense ir
SFX e r sié/P ir
SFX e r siede/P ir
SFX e r siege/P ir
SFX e r sion/L ir
SFX e r sioni/M ir
SFX e r sionse ir
SFX e r son/L ir
SFX e r soni/M ir
SFX e r sonse ir
SFX e r ven/L ir
SFX e r veni/M ir
SFX e r vense ir
SFX e r vié/P ir
SFX e r viéu/Q ir
SFX e r vion/L ir
SFX e r vioni/M ir
SFX e r vionse ir
SFX e r von/L ir
SFX e r voni/M ir
SFX e r vonse ir
