public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
dòrmo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dormir
indormir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
indòrmo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:indormir
ensir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
enso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ensir
reensir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reenso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reensir
esir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
eso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:esir
riesir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rieso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:riesir
exeguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
exèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:exeguir
languir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
languo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:languir
ƚanguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ƚanguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ƚanguir
xlanguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xlanguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xlanguir
mentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:mentir
dementir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
demento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dementir
morir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mòro/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:morir
premorir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
premòro/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:premorir
ofrir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
òfro/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ofrir
pentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:pentir
salir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
salo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:salir
saƚir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
saƚo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:saƚir
desalir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desalo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desalir
desaƚir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desaƚo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desaƚir
resalir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resalo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:resalir
resaƚir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resaƚo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:resaƚir
strasalir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
strasalo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strasalir
strasaƚir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
strasaƚo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strasaƚir
seguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:seguir
inseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
insèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inseguir
konseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konsèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konseguir
perseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
persèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:perseguir
parseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parsèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:parseguir
proseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
prosèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:proseguir
suseguir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
susèguo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:suseguir
sentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sentir
akonsentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
akonsento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:akonsentir
disentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
disento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:disentir
konsentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konsento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konsentir
malsentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
malsento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:malsentir
resentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:resentir
strasentir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
strasento/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strasentir
servir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sèrvo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:servir
aservir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
asèrvo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aservir
benservir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bensèrvo/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:benservir
sofrir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sòfro/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sofrir
ispesir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ispeso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ispesir
inspesir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inspeso/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inspesir
teñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
teño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:teñir
ateñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ateño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ateñir
aparteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aparteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aparteñir
asteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
asteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:asteñir
deteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deteñir
inkonteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkonteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inkonteñir
intrateñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intrateño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:intrateñir
konteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konteñir
manteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
manteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:manteñir
oteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
oteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:oteñir
reteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reteñir
sosteñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sosteño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sosteñir
trateñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
trateño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:trateñir
veñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
veño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:veñir
aveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aveñir
arveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
arveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:arveñir
deveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deveñir
dexveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexveñir
deskonveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deskonveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deskonveñir
interveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
interveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:interveñir
intarveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intarveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:intarveñir
intraveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontraveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
perveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resoveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rinveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skonveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
soveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:soveñir
soraveño/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:soraveñir
vèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:vestir
dexvèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexvestir
envèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:envestir
invèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:investir
revèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:revestir
reinvèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reinvestir
stravèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:stravestir
travèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:travestir
xvèsto/eEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xvestir
